Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 38 The Rhode Island Seafood Marketing Collaborative of 2011

20-38-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Seafood Marketing Collaborative of 2011.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 316, § 1.

20-38-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby finds that there are currently insufficient resources and information necessary to support Rhode Island’s local fishermen and aquaculturists and related small businesses to ensure the best possible economic and environmental outcomes for the creation of more locally produced sustainable food systems, that in particular includes seafood, in the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 111, § 1.

20-38-3.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Aquaculture” means the farming of aquatic organisms such as fish, crustaceans, mollusks, and aquatic plants.

“Collaborative” means the Rhode Island seafood marketing collaborative established under §

20-38-4

.

“Rhode Island’s local fishermen and aquaculturists” means commercial fishermen and aquaculturists licensed in the state of Rhode Island.

“Seafood dealer” means any person engaged in purchasing, raising, propagating, breeding, or acquiring or possessing live fish or fish eggs to be sold or furnished to others for the purpose of resale licensed in the state of Rhode Island.

“State agencies” means state entities responsible for the implementation of Rhode Island’s fishery management and economic development, including, but not limited to:

The department of environmental management, which shall include:

The division of agriculture and

The division of marine fisheries;

The commerce corporation;

The coastal resources management council;

The department of health;

The department of administration.

“Sustainable food system” means one in which resources (including natural resources, such as soil and water, as well as human resources, such as labor) are used at, or below, their rate of recovery.

[Deleted by P.L. 2015, ch. 100, § 1 and P.L. 2015, ch. 111, § 1].

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 191, § 7; P.L. 2017, ch. 242, § 7.

20-38-4.
Collaborative established.

There is hereby created a collaborative known as “The Rhode Island seafood marketing collaborative” consisting of nineteen (19) members as follows:

The director of the department of environmental management, or his or her designee, who shall serve as chairperson;

The chief executive officer of the commerce corporation, or his or her designee;

The chief of the division of marine fisheries of the department of environmental management, or his or her designee;

The director of the department of health, or his or her designee;

The chief of the division of agriculture of the department of environmental management, or his or her designee;

The executive director of the coastal resources management council, or his or her designee;

The director of administration, or his or her designee;

The dean of the university of Rhode Island college of environment and life sciences, or his or her designee;

The director of the Rhode Island sea grant program, or his or her designee; and

Ten (10) additional members, each of whom shall be appointed by the director of the department of environmental management, in accordance with the following categories:

Two (2) Rhode Island-based dealers/wholesalers/processors who purchase and sell finfish, shellfish, and/or crustaceans;

Two (2) commercial aquaculturists;

A Rhode Island-based retailer of seafood products associated with a restaurant or restaurant organization;

A Rhode Island-based retailer of seafood products associated with an independent or franchised store;

Two (2) commercial fishermen licensed to harvest and/or land in Rhode Island;

A member of an independent organization or association representing the Rhode Island hospitality industry;

An economist with expertise in seafood marketing.

Forthwith upon the passage of this chapter, the members of the collaborative shall meet at the call of the chairperson and organize. Thereafter, the collaborative shall meet at the call of the chairperson or three (3) members of the collaborative.

All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish such advice and information, documentation, and otherwise to the collaborative and its agents as is deemed necessary or desirable by the collaborative to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.

The members of the collaborative shall receive no compensation for their services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 191, § 7; P.L. 2017, ch. 242, § 7.

20-38-5.
Powers and duties.

The collaborative shall support and work collaboratively with the Rhode Island fishing community to promote the marketing and sustainability of Rhode Island seafood, including but not limited to:

Identifying regulatory restrictions preventing and/or inhibiting local seafood marketing initiatives and identifying opportunities to remove those regulatory restrictions;

Identifying and facilitating opportunities to increase consumer demand for local seafood;

Identifying and facilitating opportunities to establish agreements with local fishermen and seafood dealers for potential seafood marketplace expansion;

Reviewing and identifying existing studies, pilot programs and initiatives of this state and other states regarding seafood-marketing practices;

Providing educational opportunities for consumers and the fishing community regarding local seafood issues and initiatives;

Identifying funding sources available to the fishing community to support seafood marketing;

Responding to requests for information from the legislature and commenting on proposed legislation;

Issuing recommendations necessary to achieve these goals;

Identifying opportunities for potential funding to support Rhode Island seafood marketing efforts and initiatives.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 30.

20-38-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 316, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 100, § 2, effective June 19, 2015; P.L. 2015, ch. 111, § 2, effective June 19, 2015.

20-38-7.
Meeting and reporting requirements.

The collaborative shall provide a report of its findings addressing the research, marketing, expansion, and funding opportunities for local seafood. Said report shall be provided to the governor and general assembly by April 30, 2012.

Thereafter, the collaborative shall report to the governor and the general assembly, no later than April 30 of each year, on the progress made in achieving the goals and objectives set forth in this chapter and any other pertinent information by April 30, 2012.

The collaborative shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 2 of title 38, access to public records act, and chapter 46 of title 42, open meetings act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 316, § 1.